apertium-snd.snd.dix
    <pardef n="ه/وُ__prn">
      <e><p><l>هوُ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هُو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اُو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>او</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اُهو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اهو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>هُوءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اُوءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اُها</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هوءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اوءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اها</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

<!--plural is same for M and F-->
      <e><p><l>هو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>او</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اُهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>هنن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<!--Now for Close ones : -->
	<e><p><l>هِيءُ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>اِي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>اهو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>	
	<e><p><l>هيء</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>اي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>

	<e><p><l>هِيءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>اِيءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>اِها</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>	
	<e><p><l>هيءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ايءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>اها</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>	

      <e><p><l>هي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اِهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="prx"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

<!--
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ونن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
-->
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ڪ__prn">

      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spell doubt-->
      <e><p><l>نهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spell doubt-->
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spell doubt-->
      <e><p><l>نهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spell doubt-->
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/پ__prn">

      <e><p><l>اڻ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهنجو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اڻ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهنجي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>اڻ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهنجو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اڻ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهنجي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="refl"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/ج__prn">

      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spelling doubt-->
      <e><p><l>نهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spelling doubt-->

      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spelling doubt-->
      <e><p><l>نهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spelling doubt-->
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="ه"><i></i><par n="ه/وُ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪ"><i>ڪ</i><par n="/ڪ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ج"><i>ج</i><par n="/ج__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="پ"><i>پ</i><par n="/پ__prn"/></e>
